Utah statutes.
31A-26-216.   Portable electronics adjusting.

(1)  As used in this section, "automated claims adjudication system" means a preprogrammed computer system designed for the collection, data entry, calculation, and final resolution of a portable electronics insurance claim that:

(a)  may only be used by a Utah licensed independent adjuster, a Utah licensed producer, or an individual supervised as provided in this section;

(b)  complies with the claims payment requirements of this title; and

(c)  is certified as compliant with this section by a Utah licensed independent adjuster that is an officer of an organization licensed under this chapter.

(2)  An individual is exempt from licensure as an adjuster, if the individual for purposes of a portable electronics insurance claim:

(a)  collects claim information from, or furnishes claim information to, insureds or claimants;

(b)  conducts data entry, including entering data into an automated claims adjudication system;

(c)  is an employee of a licensed independent adjuster or its affiliate; and

(d)  is one of no more than 25 individuals who are under the supervision of:

(i)  a Utah licensed independent adjuster; or

(ii)  a Utah licensed producer who is exempt from licensure pursuant to Section 31A-26-201.

